lang/common/courses/twolc-lexc/a.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+N +Sg +Pl %> o2

LEXICON Root

nouns ;

LEXICON nouns
bob:bob m ;
cat m ;
boat m ;
bus m ;
tax m ;
fuzz m ;
match m ;
fish m ;
class m ;
chassis m ;
ox OX ;
spy m ;
boy m ;
photo m ;
tomato:tomato2 m ;


LEXICON m
+N+Sg: # ;
+N+Pl:%>s # ;

!LEXICON m
!+N+Sg: # ;
!+N+Pl:es # ;

LEXICON OX
+N+SG: # ;
+N+PL:%>en # ;
